dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX J Y 132
SFX J   iec         ce         iec
SFX J   iec         ca         iec
SFX J   iec         cov        iec
SFX J   iec         cu         iec
SFX J   iec         com        iec
SFX J   iec         ci         iec
SFX J   iec         coch       iec
SFX J   iec         cami       iec
SFX J   ec          ce         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          ca         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          cov        [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          cu         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          com        [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          ci         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          coch       [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          cami       [^i]ec
SFX J   0           e          [^e]c
SFX J   0           a          [^e]c
SFX J   0           ov         [^e]c
SFX J   0           u          [^e]c
SFX J   0           om         [^e]c
SFX J   0           i          [^e]c
SFX J   0           och        [^e]c
SFX J   0           mi         [^e]c
SFX J   ol          le         ol
SFX J   ol          la         ol
SFX J   ol          lov        ol
SFX J   ol          lu         ol
SFX J   ol          lom        ol
SFX J   ol          li         ol
SFX J   ol          loch       ol
SFX J   ol          lami       ol
SFX J   0           e          [^o]l
SFX J   0           a          [^o]l
SFX J   0           ov         [^o]l
SFX J   0           u          [^o]l
SFX J   0           om         [^o]l
SFX J   0           i          [^o]l
SFX J   0           och        [^o]l
SFX J   0           ami        [^o]l
SFX J   eľ          le         [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          ľa         [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          ľov        [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          ľu         [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          ľom        [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          li         [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          ľoch       [gz]eľ
SFX J   eľ          ľami       [gz]eľ
SFX J   0           a          [^pgz]eľ
SFX J   ľ           le         [^gz]eľ
SFX J   ľ           li         [^gz]eľ
SFX J   eň          ni         [dž]eň
SFX J   eň          ňa         [dž]eň
SFX J   eň          ní         deň
SFX J   eň          ňu         [dž]eň
SFX J   eň          ňom        [dž]eň
SFX J   eň          ňoch       [dž]eň
SFX J   eň          ňami       [dž]eň
SFX J   eň          ne         žeň
SFX J   eň          ňov        žeň
SFX J   ň           ne         [^dž]eň
SFX J   ň           ňa         [^dž]eň
SFX J   0           ov         [^dž]eň
SFX J   ň           ňu         [^dž]eň
SFX J   ň           ňom        [^dž]eň
SFX J   ň           ni         [^dž]eň
SFX J   ň           ňoch       [^dž]eň
SFX J   0           mi         [^dž]eň
SFX J   er          re         er
SFX J   er          ra         er
SFX J   er          rov        er
SFX J   er          ru         er
SFX J   er          rom        er
SFX J   er          ri         er
SFX J   er          roch       er
SFX J   er          rami       er
SFX J   or          re         or
SFX J   or          ra         or
SFX J   or          rov        or
SFX J   or          ru         or
SFX J   or          rom        or
SFX J   or          ri         or
SFX J   or          roch       or
SFX J   or          rami       or
SFX J   0           e          [^o]r
SFX J   0           a          [^o]r
SFX J   0           ov         [^o]r
SFX J   0           u          [^o]r
SFX J   0           om         [^o]r
SFX J   0           i          [^o]r
SFX J   0           och        [^o]r
SFX J   0           ami        [^o]r
SFX J   ôš          oše        ôš
SFX J   ôš          oša        ôš
SFX J   ôš          ošov       ôš
SFX J   ôš          ošu        ôš
SFX J   ôš          ošom       ôš
SFX J   ôš          oši        ôš
SFX J   ôš          ošoch      ôš
SFX J   ôš          ošmi       ôš
SFX J   eť          te         eť
SFX J   eť          ťa         eť
SFX J   eť          ťov        eť
SFX J   eť          ťu         eť
SFX J   eť          ťom        eť
SFX J   eť          ti         eť
SFX J   eť          ťoch       eť
SFX J   eť          ťami       eť
SFX J   ôž          ože        ôž
SFX J   ôž          oža        ôž
SFX J   ôž          ožov       ôž
SFX J   ôž          ožu        ôž
SFX J   ôž          ožom       ôž
SFX J   ôž          oži        ôž
SFX J   ôž          ožoch      ôž
SFX J   ôž          ožmi       ôž
SFX J   0           e          [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           a          [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           ov         [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           u          [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           om         [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           i          [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           och        [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           mi         [e][^cľňr]
SFX J   0           e          [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           a          [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           ov         [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           u          [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           om         [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           i          [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           och        [^ceľňršž]
SFX J   0           mi         [^ceľňršž]

SFX L Y 60
SFX L   0           e          č
SFX L   ec          ce         ec
SFX L   ec          ca         ec
SFX L   ec          cov        ec
SFX L   ec          covi       ec
SFX L   ec          com        ec
SFX L   ec          coch       ec
SFX L   ec          cami       ec
SFX L   0           via        o
SFX L   o           a          o
SFX L   0           v          o
SFX L   0           vi         o
SFX L   0           m          o
SFX L   0           ch         o
SFX L   0           m          o
SFX L   o           ami        o
SFX L   0           e          ár
SFX L   0           y          [tv]er
SFX L   0           a          [tv]er
SFX L   0           ov         [tv]er
SFX L   0           ovi        [tv]er
SFX L   0           om         [tv]er
SFX L   0           och        [tv]er
SFX L   0           mi         [tv]er
SFX L   er          re         [^tv]er
SFX L   er          ra         [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rov        [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rovi       [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rom        [^tv]er
SFX L   er          roch       [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rami       [^tv]er
SFX L   0           y          [^áe][cr]
SFX L   0           a          [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           ov         [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           ovi        [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           om         [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           och        [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           mi         [^e][cr]
SFX L   es          sy         es
SFX L   es          sa         es
SFX L   es          sov        es
SFX L   es          sovi       es
SFX L   es          som        es
SFX L   es          soch       es
SFX L   es          sami       es
SFX L   0           y          [^čcéior]
SFX L   0           a          [^céior]
SFX L   0           ov         [^céior]
SFX L   0           ovi        [^céior]
SFX L   0           om         [^céior]
SFX L   0           och        [^céior]
SFX L   0           mi         [^céior]
SFX L   us          a          us
SFX L   us          ovi        us
SFX L   us          om         us
SFX L   us          y          us
SFX L   us          ov         us
SFX L   us          om         us
SFX L   us          och        us
SFX L   us          ami        us
